Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1626
Lighting and thermal efficiency; violation; penalty.

Failure to comply with sections 81-1608 to 81-1626 or ordering, instructing, or directing another not to comply with sections 81-1608 to 81-1626 shall be a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 50.